Massachusetts, session 194th, H381.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 25C subsection (f) of Chapter 138 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“necessary”, the following words:-
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Chapter, a licensee authorized
to sell alcoholic beverages at retail for off-premises consumption may issue coupons to
customers for the purchase of alcoholic beverages at prices below current posted prices provided
that the final cost to a customer is not below the retailer’s invoiced cost after applicable
discounts.
of 1